Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.190

Civil action—Award.

(1) In the event that the supplier fails to make payment in accordance with the terms of RCW 19.98.170 or violates any other provisions of RCW 19.98.170 or 19.98.180, a dealer may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to obtain payment of a warranty claim submitted to a supplier.

(2) In the event that the court finds that the supplier has failed to make payment in accordance with the terms of RCW 19.98.170 or has violated any other provisions of RCW 19.98.170 or 19.98.180, the court shall award the dealer costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

[ 2002 c 236 s 12.]